California statutes. Insurance Code
1470.

In any form of policy prescribed by this code, the attorney may insert provisions or conditions required by the plan of reciprocal or interinsurance if the plan is not inconsistent with, or in conflict with, any law of this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Agents and Brokers [1500. - 1500.]

1500.

The provisions of this code regarding the appointment, licensing, qualification and regulation of insurance agents, brokers and solicitors, apply neither to the attorney-in-fact of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, nor to the salaried representatives of such exchange or attorney who receive no commissions, but do apply in the case of any agent, broker or solicitor of any reciprocal or interinsurance exchange who receives any commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 577.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Penalties [1510. - 1512.]

1510.

Any attorney-in-fact or representative of such an attorney who exchanges, or solicits or negotiates the exchange of, any contracts of insurance of the kind and character specified in this chapter, except as provided in section 1511, without compliance by the attorney with the provisions of this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1511.

For the purpose of organization, and upon issuance of permit by the commissioner, powers of attorney and applications for such policies may be solicited without compliance with the provisions of this chapter, but no attorney, agent or other person shall execute any such policies until all of the provisions of this chapter are complied with.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1512.

In addition to the foregoing penalties and where not otherwise provided, the penalty for failure or refusal to comply with any or all of the provisions of this chapter upon the part of the attorney, shall be the refusal, suspension or revocation of certificate of authority. Before such refusal, suspension or revocation, notice and hearing shall be given such attorney in accordance with the procedure provided in Section 704.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 901.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Tax Provisions [1530. - 1531.]

1530.

In lieu of all other taxes, licenses or fees whatever, state or local, each exchange and its corporate attorney in fact considered as a single unit shall together pay annually on account of the transaction of such business in this state, the same fees as are paid by mutual insurers transacting the same kind of business, and the annual tax imposed by Section 28 of Article XIII of the Constitution of the State of California and by the applicable provisions of the Revenue and Taxation Code, except that each corporate attorney in fact of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange shall be subject to all taxes imposed upon other corporations doing business in the state, other than taxes directly attributable to property used exclusively in or on income derived from its principal business as corporate attorney in fact. In any event, such corporate attorney in fact shall file an annual return and pay the minimum tax provided for by Section 23151 of the Bank and Corporation Tax Law. For the purposes of Section 12221 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the term gross premiums, as applied to reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges, includes all sums paid by subscribers in this state by reason of the insurance exchange, whether termed premium deposit, membership fee, or otherwise, after deducting therefrom premium deposit returns or cancellations, and all amounts returned to subscribers or credited to their accounts as savings, but does not include such sums received for reinsurance and for ocean marine insurance.

A corporate attorney in fact of each exchange shall annually compute the amount of tax that would be payable by it under the provisions of the Bank and Corporation Tax Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) except for the provisions of this section, and any management fee due from each exchange to its corporate attorney in fact shall be reduced pro tanto by a sum equivalent to the amount so computed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 186.)
-------------------------------------------

1531.

(a) On and after January 1, 1994, and before January 1, 1995, every exchange and its corporate attorney in fact that is considered a single unit whose annual taxes exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall make payment by electronic funds transfer. On and after January 1, 1995, every exchange and its corporate attorney in fact that is considered a single unit whose annual taxes exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) shall make payment by electronic funds transfer. The exchange and its corporate attorney in fact considered as a single unit shall choose one of the acceptable methods described in Section 45 for completing the electronic funds transfer.

(b) Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated, if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(c) (1) Any exchange and its corporate attorney in fact considered as a single unit required to remit taxes by electronic funds transfer pursuant to this section who remits those taxes by means other than an appropriate electronic funds transfer, shall be assessed a penalty in an amount equal to 10 percent of the taxes due at the time of the payment.

(2) If the department finds that the failure of an exchange and its corporate attorney in fact, considered as a single unit, to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with subdivision (a) is due to reasonable cause or circumstances beyond the exchange’s and its corporate attorney in fact’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that exchange and its corporate attorney in fact shall be relieved of the penalty provided in paragraph (1).

(3) Any exchange and its corporate attorney in fact seeking to be relieved of the penalty provided in paragraph (1) shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the claim for relief is based.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 721, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Merger [1540. - 1540.]

1540.

Any two or more domestic reciprocal insurers, upon affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of the subscribers of each such insurer who vote on such merger pursuant to due notice and the prior approval of the commissioner of the terms of such notice, of the manner and form of such voting and of such proposed merger, may merge. The commissioner shall not approve any plan for such merger which is inequitable to subscribers, or in any case where the bylaws or other rules, regulations, power of attorney or other instrument affecting the rights of subscribers of either such reciprocal, has been amended within one year prior to the date of filing with the commissioner of the application for such approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 164.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Merger of Certain Reciprocal Insurers [1550. - 1559.]

1550.

This article shall apply only to domestic reciprocal insurers organized after 1974 to provide medical malpractice insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1551.

By following the procedure specified in this article, any domestic reciprocal insurer described in this article may merge, consolidate, or otherwise unite with or become a part of, or may reinsure all of its policies with, and, upon assumption of all of its liabilities, may transfer all of its assets to, any other domestic reciprocal insurer or an incorporated insurer, domestic or foreign. If an insurer not admitted in California is the surviving entity in the transaction, the plan and agreement shall provide either for that insurer to be admitted to transact insurance in California or for any nonsurviving insurer admitted in California to withdraw from the state. The plan and agreement by which the transaction is to be effected shall be approved by a resolution of a majority of the body exercising the subscribers’ rights selected pursuant to Section 1308 for each domestic reciprocal insurer that is a party to the transaction or by such higher number as may be required by the documents governing the reciprocal, before it is submitted to the subscribers for their consideration. The resolution shall specify the reasons for and the purposes of the proposed transaction and the manner in which the transaction is expected to benefit and serve the best interests of the domestic reciprocal insurer and its subscribers. The plan and agreement shall be approved on behalf of each constituent other party by those persons required to approve those transactions by the laws under which that other party is organized or is otherwise governed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1552.

The plan and agreement by which the transaction is to be effected shall be submitted to the commissioner, who shall examine it and require those provisions to be inserted in the agreement and any actions to be taken in connection with the transaction, including, but not limited to, (a) the terms and conditions of the transaction, (b) any fee, commission, right, option, benefit, or other valuable consideration paid or offered to or for the benefit of any director, officer, employee, subscriber, agent, or broker of each domestic reciprocal insurer or the insurer’s attorney-in-fact in connection with the transaction, (c) the contents of the notice of the vote on the transaction by the subscribers of each domestic reciprocal insurer that is a party thereto, (d) the manner and form of voting thereon by the subscribers of each domestic reciprocal insurer, and (e) any other change, that he or she may deem necessary in order that the transaction may be fair, just, and equitable to the subscribers of each domestic reciprocal insurer that is a party to the transaction, and the transaction is otherwise fair, just, and equitable to the parties to the transaction and their respective policyholders, owners, creditors, and the public. The commissioner shall not approve any transaction if the bylaws, rules, regulations, power of attorney, or instrument affecting the voting or distribution rights of subscribers of a domestic reciprocal insurer have been amended to change those rights within one year prior to the date of filing of the plan and agreement with the commissioner. The subscribers of a domestic reciprocal insurer who shall be eligible to participate in the transaction shall be those persons who are current subscribers of the domestic reciprocal insurer at the date the commissioner approves the plan and agreement for submission to the subscribers for approval pursuant to Section 1553, or at another date determined by the commissioner. No director, officer, agent, or employee of the domestic reciprocal insurer or the insurer’s attorney-in-fact shall receive any fee, commission, or other valuable consideration whatsoever, other than regular salary and compensation, for in any manner aiding, promoting, or assisting in the transaction, except as set forth in the plan and agreement approved by the commissioner. This provision shall not be deemed to prohibit the payment of reasonable fees and compensation to attorneys at law, accountants, and actuaries for services performed in the independent practice of their professions, even though they may also be directors of the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1553.

When the plan and agreement has been approved by the commissioner, with any changes required by him or her, it shall require the approval of each domestic reciprocal insurer that is a party to the transaction by not less than two-thirds of the votes cast by its subscribers represented in person or by proxy at a meeting called to consider the plan and agreement. At least 30 days before the day fixed for the meeting, notice of the meeting and its purpose shall be given to the subscribers at their addresses appearing on the books maintained at the home office of the insurer. With respect to subscribers whose addresses do not appear on the books of the insurer, notice shall be deemed to have been given if published at least once in some newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office of the insurer is located. At the meeting, the presence in person or by proxy of 10 percent of the subscribers of the insurer shall constitute a quorum. In the absence of a quorum, the subscribers present at the meeting in person or by proxy may adjourn the meeting to a later date. If the meeting is adjourned to the next business day, no further notice need be given of the date to which the meeting is adjourned. If the meeting is adjourned to a date later than the next business day, notice of the date to which the meeting is adjourned shall be given to the subscribers at least 15 days prior to the adjourned meeting date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1554.

If one of the insurers that is a party to the transaction is a domestic incorporated insurer, Section 1109 of the Corporations Code shall apply if the transaction is a merger or consolidation, and Section 1113 of the Corporations Code shall also apply if the transaction is a merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1555.

(a) If the vote is in the affirmative, a certified copy of all proceedings relating to the proposed transaction shall be filed with the commissioner. If one of the insurers that is a party to the transaction is a foreign incorporated insurer, there shall also be filed with the commissioner evidence of that approval, consent, or authorization that is required by the laws of the state of incorporation of the foreign insurer. If the commissioner finds that the proceedings have been in accordance with the law and his or her requirements, the commissioner shall issue a certificate approving the plan and agreement and the transaction shall become effective (1) in the case of a merger, when the certificate, the agreement of merger, or the certificate of merger, as applicable, and any other documents required by law have been filed with the Secretary of State, unless a future effective date or time is provided in the agreement of merger or certificate of merger, in which event the merger shall be effective at that future effective date or time, (2) in the case of a consolidation, when any documents required by the commissioner have been filed with and approved by the commissioner, unless a future effective date or time is provided in the agreement of consolidation, in which event the consolidation shall be effective at that future effective date or time, or (3) in the case of another form of transaction, when determined by the commissioner.

(b) The fee of the commissioner for considering the proposed transaction and issuing a certificate approving the transaction shall be four thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($4,250), payable in advance with the filing with the commissioner of the first papers relating to the proposed transaction. Five dollars ($5) shall be charged for each signed and sealed or certified copy of the certificate issued as part of the same transaction in which the original certificate is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1556.

(a) If the surviving entity is a domestic incorporated insurer in a merger in which a domestic reciprocal insurer is a constituent party, after approval of the merger by the constituent reciprocal insurer and constituent incorporated insurer, the surviving incorporated insurer shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a copy of the agreement of merger and attachments required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 1113 of the Corporations Code.

(b) If the surviving entity is a domestic reciprocal insurer in a merger in which a domestic incorporated insurer is a constituent party, after approval of the merger by the constituent disappearing domestic incorporated insurer and constituent reciprocal insurer, the surviving reciprocal insurer shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a copy of the agreement of merger and attachments required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1113 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1557.

(a) Any plan of merger, consolidation, or other unification under this article shall provide that all rights and properties of the parties to the plan of merger, consolidation, or other unification shall accrue to, and become the rights and properties of, the surviving or consolidated or continuing insurer which shall succeed to and assume all the obligations and liabilities of the merged, consolidating, or transferring insurer in the same manner as if incurred or contracted by the surviving, consolidated, or continuing insurer.

(b) All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of each of the constituent incorporated insurers and constituent reciprocal insurers shall be preserved unimpaired, provided that those liens upon property of a disappearing incorporated insurer or disappearing reciprocal insurer shall be limited to the property affected thereby immediately prior to the time the merger is effective.

(c) Any action or proceeding pending by or against any disappearing incorporated insurer or disappearing reciprocal insurer may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the surviving incorporated insurer or surviving reciprocal insurer, or the surviving incorporated insurer or surviving reciprocal insurer may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1558.

In the event a domestic reciprocal insurer is merged, is consolidated, or is part of a reorganization pursuant to the procedures specified in this article and the surviving, consolidated, or continuing company is a stock incorporated insurer, the plan shall provide for the manner of converting or exchanging the equity interests of current subscribers in the reciprocal insurer’s equity into (a) shares, interests, or other securities of the surviving corporation, and (b) if any interests of the subscribers are not to be converted solely into shares, interests, or other securities of the surviving corporation, cash, property rights, interests, warrants, options, premium credits, or securities that may be in addition to, or in lieu of, shares, interests, or other securities of the surviving corporation. However, notwithstanding the foregoing, the equity interests of current subscribers in the reciprocal insurer’s equity may be converted or exchanged solely into premium credits if the plan and agreement so provide but only at the subscriber’s election. The conversion or exchange of the equity interests of subscribers shall be on terms fair, just, and equitable to the parties to the transaction, their subscribers, shareholders, owners, and creditors, as approved by the commissioner, and the commissioner shall require an opinion as to the fairness of those terms and an appraisal of the fair value of the domestic reciprocal insurer, together with the respective equity interests therein, by one or more qualified disinterested persons appointed by the reciprocal insurer with the approval of the commissioner, unless the commissioner finds that such an opinion or appraisal is not necessary to protect the interest of current subscribers of the reciprocal insurer. The expense of any such opinion and appraisal shall be borne by the reciprocal insurer. Any person holding a subscription note or other debt instrument evidencing a capital contribution to the domestic reciprocal insurer shall be entitled upon demand to have redeemed that note or debt instrument for cash or securities if securities are offered to current policyholders as part of the transaction. The plan may authorize the sale of securities to members of the governing board, officers, or employees of the domestic reciprocal insurer or its attorney-in-fact, or to subscribers or former subscribers of the domestic reciprocal insurer, in accordance with the provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1. Nothing in this section shall preclude the issuance of different securities, subject to the approval of the commissioner, provided that comparable securities shall be issued at prices not less than the conversion or exchange values of any such securities distributed to current subscribers. The conversion or exchange shall constitute full payment and discharge of the subscribers’ equity interests in the domestic reciprocal insurer, and the subscribers shall have no other rights with respect thereto, except for rights relating to a continuing debt or equity interest that a former subscriber holds in the surviving insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1559.

(a) For all purposes for a merger in which the surviving entity is a domestic reciprocal insurer and a domestic incorporated insurer is not a constituent corporation as that term is defined under Section 161 of the Corporations Code, a copy of the certificate of merger duly certified by the commissioner is conclusive evidence of the merger of the constituent reciprocal insurers, either by themselves or together with any foreign incorporated insurers, into the surviving reciprocal insurer.

(b) For all purposes for a merger in which the surviving entity is a domestic reciprocal insurer and a domestic incorporated insurer is a “constituent corporation” as that term is defined under Section 161 of the Corporations Code, a copy of the certificate of merger duly certified by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence of the merger of the constituent reciprocal insurers, either by themselves or together with constituent incorporated insurers, into the surviving reciprocal insurers.

(c) For all purposes for a merger in which the surviving entity is a domestic incorporated insurer and the disappearing entity is a domestic reciprocal insurer, a copy of the certificate of merger duly certified by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence of the merger of the constituent insurers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Conversion of Certain Reciprocal Insurers to Incorporated Stock Insurers [1560. - 1560.19.]

1560.

This article shall apply only to domestic reciprocal insurers organized after 1974 to provide medical malpractice insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.01.

By following the procedure specified in this article, any domestic reciprocal insurer described in Section 1560 may be converted into an incorporated stock insurer. To that end, it may provide and carry out a plan for the conversion by complying with the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.02.

The definitions in this section apply to the following terms when used in this article:

(a) “Adoption date” means the date the governing body adopts the plan of conversion.

(b) “Converted insurer” means the incorporated stock insurer into which a domestic reciprocal insurer has been converted in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(c) “Converting insurer” means, for a plan of conversion under this article, the domestic reciprocal insurer that is converting under the plan.

(d) “Effective date” means the date upon which the conversion of a domestic reciprocal insurer is effective, as specified in the amended articles of incorporation of the reciprocal holding company filed with the Secretary of State, as a result of conversion proceedings under this article.

(e) “Eligible subscribers” means the subscribers of the domestic reciprocal insurer who are of record, fully paid-up, and otherwise in good standing on the domestic reciprocal insurer’s adoption date and on its effective date, but shall not include those persons covered solely under a reporting endorsement to a claims-made policy on either date.

(f) “Governing body” means the body exercising subscribers’ rights selected pursuant to Section 1308 for the domestic reciprocal insurer.

(g) “Independent director” means a member of the governing body of the reciprocal holding company who does not own shares, options, or any other equity interests in the stock holding company.

(h) “Person” means an individual, partnership, firm, association, corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, trust, government or governmental agency, state or political subdivision of a state, public or private corporation, board, association, estate, trustee, or fiduciary, or any similar entity.

(i) “Plan of conversion” or “plan” means a plan adopted by a domestic reciprocal insurer in compliance with this article.

(j) “Policy” means an individual or group policy of insurance issued by a domestic reciprocal insurer. If a policy takes a form other than an individual form but holders of certificates or other interests under the policy are treated by the domestic reciprocal insurer as if they were holders of individual policies, the domestic reciprocal insurer may provide in its plan of conversion under this article that such a certificate or other interest is deemed to be a policy and deem the holder of the certificate or other interest to be an owner of a policy. Such a provision shall be for the sole purpose of determining the rights, if any, of policyholders of the domestic reciprocal insurer to vote upon and receive consideration under the plan of conversion and shall not affect the other voting rights and qualifications of members of the domestic reciprocal insurer.

(k) “Policyholder” means the holder of a policy other than a reinsurance contract or a person covered solely under a reporting endorsement to a claims-made policy.

(l) “Reciprocal holding company” means a corporation organized under the laws of this state subject to the General Corporation Law as set forth in the Corporations Code. The articles of incorporation of a reciprocal holding company shall contain provisions stating the following:

(1) It is a reciprocal holding company organized under this article.

(2) One purpose of the reciprocal holding company is to hold not less than 51 percent of the voting stock of a stock holding company, which in turn holds all of the voting stock of a converted insurer. In addition, the reciprocal holding company shall own not less than 51 percent of the total stockholders’ equity of the stock holding company at all times.

(3) It is not authorized to issue voting stock.

(4) Its subscribers have the rights specified in Section 1560.11 and in its articles of incorporation and bylaws.

(5) Its assets and liabilities are subject to inclusion in the estate of the converted insurer in any proceedings successfully prosecuted against the converted insurer under Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) or Article 14.3 (commencing with Section 1064.1) of Chapter 1.

(m) “Rights in surplus” for a domestic reciprocal insurer, means rights of subscribers to a return of that portion of the surplus that has not been apportioned or declared by the governing body for policyholder dividends. “Rights in surplus” includes rights of subscribers to a distribution of surplus in liquidation or conservation of the insurer under this code, or in a dissolution or winding up. “Rights in surplus” does not include any right expressly conferred solely by the terms of an insurance policy.

(n) “Stock holding company” means a corporation authorized to issue one or more classes of capital stock, the corporate purposes of which include holding all of the voting stock in an insurer that has been converted from a domestic reciprocal insurer into a stock insurer in proceedings under this article in which a reciprocal holding company is formed.

(o) “Subscriber” means a person who, by the records of the domestic reciprocal insurer and its rules and regulations, is deemed to be a holder of a subscriber’s interest in the domestic reciprocal insurer. On and after the effective date of a plan of conversion, the term “subscriber” means a member of a reciprocal holding company, as provided in Section 1560.11.

(p) “Subscriber interests” mean the interests of subscribers arising under this code and the rules and regulations of the domestic reciprocal insurer or otherwise by law.

(q) “Voting stock” means securities of any class or any ownership interest having voting power for the election of directors, trustees, or management of a person, other than securities having voting power only because of the occurrence of a contingency. All references to a specified percentage of voting stock of any person mean securities having the specified percentage of the voting power in that person for the election of directors, trustees, or management of that person, other than securities having voting power only because of the occurrence of a contingency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.03.

A plan of conversion adopted by a domestic reciprocal insurer for the establishment of a reciprocal holding company shall provide that the domestic reciprocal insurer will become a stock insurer, that the subscribers of the domestic reciprocal insurer will become subscribers of a reciprocal holding company, that the reciprocal holding company will acquire at least 51 percent of the voting stock of the stock holding company, and that the stock holding company will acquire all of the voting stock of the converted insurer. The plan of conversion shall include appropriate proceedings for amending the domestic reciprocal insurer’s rules and regulations and other charter documents to give effect to the conversion from a domestic reciprocal insurer into a stock corporation. The plan shall be:

(a) As approved by a resolution of two-thirds of the governing board. The resolution shall specify the reasons for and the purposes of the proposed conversion of the domestic reciprocal insurer and the manner in which the conversion is expected to benefit and serve the best interests of the policyholders.

(b) Submitted to the commissioner for consent in writing, subject to the provisions of Section 1560.05, by an application executed by an authorized officer of the domestic reciprocal insurer and accompanied by the following documents, or true and correct copies of the following documents:

(1) The proposed plan of conversion.

(2) The proposed articles of incorporation of each corporation that is a constituent corporation of the conversion.

(3) The proposed bylaws of each corporation that is a constituent corporation of the conversion.

(4) A list of the officers and directors, together with their biographies in the form customarily required by the commissioner, of each corporation that is a constituent corporation of the conversion.

(5) The resolution of the governing board of the domestic reciprocal insurer, certified by the secretary of the domestic reciprocal insurer, authorizing the conversion under this article, and a report of the percentage of directors approving the resolution.

(6) Financial statements, which may be prepared on a pro forma basis, in the form required by the commissioner.

(7) A plan of operations for the converted insurer.

(8) A summary of the plan of conversion and drafts of written materials to be mailed to subscribers seeking their approval of the plan, including an information statement containing, at a minimum, the information required under Section 1560.06.

(9) A description of any plans for an initial public offering, including a description of the maximum percentage of stock to be sold, the process to be used in offering the stock and setting the initial sale price for the stock, and how policyholders would be treated in an initial public offering.

(10) A description of any plans for the transfer of assets and liabilities, including any subsidiaries, to the reciprocal holding company.

(11) Any final rulings relating to the plan of reorganization obtained from any federal government agency, and all supporting documents submitted to the agency in connection with the rulings.

(12) A copy of the proposed form of notice of special meeting to be sent to members pursuant to Section 1560.06.

(13) Other relevant information that the commissioner may require.

(c) Approved by two-thirds vote of the subscribers of the domestic reciprocal insurer voting at a meeting of the subscribers called for that purpose, subject to the provisions of Section 1560.06.

(d) Filed in the office of the commissioner after receipt of the commissioner’s consent, and after having been approved as provided in Sections 1560.05 and 1560.06.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.05.

(a) The commissioner shall examine the plan submitted pursuant to Section 1560.03. As a part of the examination the commissioner shall order a public hearing of the plan after written notice of the hearing to the domestic reciprocal insurer and its subscribers and the public, all of whom shall have the right to appear at the hearing. The hearing shall occur before the policyholder vote. The commissioner may require as a condition of consent that the domestic reciprocal insurer make modifications of the proposed plan that the commissioner finds necessary for the protection of policyholders. The commissioner shall consent to the plan if he or she finds all of the following:

(1) The plan is fair, just, and equitable to the insurer and its policyholders.

(2) The plan does not violate the law.

(3) The converted insurer will, after the conversion, satisfy the requirements for the issuance of a license to write the line or lines of insurance for which it is presently licensed.

(4) The plan will not require subscribers to pay additional funds to retain their rights in surplus, but nothing herein is intended to prohibit or restrict a reciprocal insurer that is converting to a stock insurer by establishing a reciprocal holding company from offering to its subscribers subscription rights that are in addition to the rights in surplus to be held in the reciprocal holding company.

(5) Any stock issued to officers, directors, employees, or employee benefit plans for their benefit, if any, will be fair, just, and equitable and not hazardous to policyholders, stockholders, or creditors.

(6) The plan provides sufficient means for the accumulated earnings, cash, and/or other non-operating assets held by the reciprocal holding company to inure to the exclusive benefit of its members.

(b) The commissioner may appoint one or more actuarial, financial, or other consultants, including legal counsel, as the commissioner finds necessary to advise the commissioner in making the determination of whether the proposed plan of conversion meets the applicable requirements of this article. The domestic reciprocal insurer is responsible for the reasonable fees and expenses of any actuarial, financial, or other consultants, including legal counsel, appointed, and for the mailing and publication of notices to the domestic reciprocal insurer and its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.06.

The meeting of subscribers prescribed by subdivision (c) of Section 1560.03 shall be called by the governing board, the chairperson of the board, or the president of the domestic reciprocal insurer. Notice of the meeting shall be given to eligible subscribers by mail at least 45 days prior to the date set for the meeting to subscribers of the domestic reciprocal insurer of record on the date the plan of conversion was adopted by the governing board. The notice shall be accompanied by an information statement describing the proposed reorganization. The information statement shall include, at a minimum, all of the following items:

(a) A full copy and summary of the plan of reorganization.

(b) A discussion addressing the reasons and purposes of the proposed restructuring, which shall include a comparison to a dereciprocalization.

(c) An analysis of the benefits and risks associated with the proposed reorganization to the reciprocal company and its policyholders.

(d) An explanation of how the restructuring will benefit policyholders, as well as a description of any potential risks to policyholder interests and a description of how the policyholders’ rights differ at the reciprocal holding company level from those in the existing company.

(e) A description of any stock issuance, including any shares or options to be issued to directors, officers, agents, employees, or employee benefit plans, for their benefit, that will be made in conjunction with the plan of conversion, if any, and the guidelines and parameters that shall apply in the event stock is to be issued, including a detailed discussion of subscription rights that are to be granted to policyholders.

(f) The converted insurer’s proposed articles of incorporation and bylaws.

(g) Any proposed articles and bylaws of the reciprocal holding company and any other entities to be created in the reorganization.

(h) Financial information.

(i) Any other information that the commissioner determines is necessary to make a complete and adequate disclosure to policyholders.

Voting shall be by ballot, in person, or by proxy. A quorum shall consist of 10 percent of the subscribers of the domestic reciprocal insurer entitled to vote at the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.07.
